California statutes. Corporations Code
(5) If the consents of all shareholders are not solicited in writing, the opinion shall be delivered to each shareholder whose consent is solicited prior to that shareholder’s consent being given, and to all other shareholders at the time they are given the notice required by subdivision (b) of Section 603.

For purposes of this section, the term “interested party” means a person who is a party to the transaction and (A) directly or indirectly controls the corporation that is the subject of the tender offer or proposal, (B) is, or is directly or indirectly controlled by, an officer or director of the subject corporation, or (C) is an entity in which a material financial interest
 (subdivision (a) of Section 310) is held by any director or executive officer of the subject corporation. For purposes of the preceding sentence, “any executive officer” means the president, any vice president in charge of a principal business unit, division, or function such as sales, administration, research, development, or finance, and any other officer or other person who performs a policymaking function or has the same duties as those of a president or vice president. The opinion required by this subdivision shall be provided by a person who is not affiliated with the offeror and who, for compensation, engages in the business of advising others as to the value of properties, businesses, or securities. The fact that the opining person previously has provided services to the offeror or a related entity or is simultaneously engaged in providing advice or assistance with respect to the proposed transaction in a manner which makes its compensation contingent on the success of the proposed transaction shall
 not, for those reasons, be deemed to affiliate the opining person with the offeror. Nothing in this subdivision shall limit the applicability of the standards of review of the transaction in the event of a challenge thereto under Section 310 or subdivision (c) of Section 1312.

This subdivision shall not apply to an Interested Party Proposal if the corporation that is the subject thereof does not have shares held of record by 100 or more persons (determined as provided in Section 605), or if the transaction has been qualified under Section 25113 or 25121 and no order under Section 25140 or subdivision (a) of Section 25143 is in effect with respect to that qualification.

(b) If a tender of shares or a vote or written consent is being sought pursuant to an Interested Party Proposal and a later tender offer or written proposal for a reorganization subject to Section 1200 or sale of assets subject to
 subdivision (a) of Section 1001 that would require a vote or written consent of shareholders is made to the corporation or its shareholders (herein referred to as a “Later Proposal”) by any other person at least 10 days prior to the date for acceptance of the tendered shares or the vote or notice of shareholder approval on the Interested Party Proposal, then each of the following shall apply:

(1) The shareholders shall be informed of the Later Proposal and any written material provided for this purpose by the later offeror shall be forwarded to the shareholders at that offeror’s expense.

(2) The shareholders shall be afforded a reasonable opportunity to withdraw any vote, consent, or proxy previously given before the vote or written consent on the Interested Party Proposal becomes effective, or a reasonable time to withdraw any tendered shares before the purchase of the shares
 pursuant to the Interested Party Proposal. For purposes of this subdivision, a delay of 10 days from the notice or publication of the Later Proposal shall be deemed to provide a reasonable opportunity or time to effect that withdrawal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 216, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Dissenters’ Rights [1300. - 1313.]

1300.

(a) If the approval of the outstanding shares (Section 152) of a corporation is required for a reorganization under subdivisions (a) and (b) or subdivision (e) or (f) of Section 1201, each shareholder of the corporation entitled to vote on the transaction and each shareholder of a subsidiary corporation in a short-form merger may, by complying with this chapter, require the corporation in which the shareholder holds shares to purchase for cash at their fair market value the shares owned by the shareholder which are dissenting shares as defined in subdivision (b). The fair market value shall be determined as of the day of, and immediately prior to, the first announcement of the terms of the proposed reorganization or short-form merger, excluding any appreciation or depreciation in consequence of the proposed reorganization or
 short-form merger, as adjusted for any stock split, reverse stock split, or share dividend that becomes effective thereafter.

(b) As used in this chapter, “dissenting shares” means shares to which all of the following apply:

(1) That were not, immediately prior to the reorganization or short-form merger, listed on any national securities exchange certified by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under subdivision (o) of Section 25100, and the notice of meeting of shareholders to act upon the reorganization summarizes this section and Sections 1301, 1302, 1303, and 1304; provided, however, that this provision does not apply to any shares with respect to which there exists any restriction on transfer imposed by the corporation or by any law or regulation; and provided, further, that this provision does not apply to any shares where the holder of those shares is
 required, by the terms of the reorganization or short-form merger, to accept for the shares anything except: (A) shares of any other corporation, which shares, at the time the reorganization or short-form merger is effective, are listed on any national securities exchange certified by the Commissioner of Financial Protection and Innovation under subdivision (o) of Section 25100; (B) cash in lieu of fractional shares described in the foregoing subparagraph (A); or (C) any combination of the shares and cash in lieu of fractional shares described in the foregoing subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(2) That were outstanding on the date for the determination of shareholders entitled to vote on the reorganization and (A) were not voted in favor of the reorganization or, (B) if described in paragraph (1), were voted against the reorganization, or were held of record on the effective date of a short-form merger; provided, however, that subparagraph (A) rather
 than subparagraph (B) of this paragraph applies in any case where the approval required by Section 1201 is sought by written consent rather than at a meeting.

(3) That the dissenting shareholder has demanded that the corporation purchase at their fair market value, in accordance with Section 1301.

(4) That the dissenting shareholder has submitted for endorsement, in accordance with Section 1302.

(c) As used in this chapter, “dissenting shareholder” means the recordholder of dissenting shares and includes a transferee of record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 452, Sec. 48.   (SB 1498)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1301.

(a) If, in the case of a reorganization, any shareholders of a corporation have a right under Section 1300, subject to compliance with paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) thereof, to require the corporation to purchase their shares for cash, that corporation shall mail to each of those shareholders a notice of the approval of the reorganization by its outstanding shares (Section 152) within 10 days
 after the date of that approval, accompanied by a copy of Sections 1300, 1302, 1303, and 1304 and this section, a statement of the price determined by the corporation to represent the fair market value of the dissenting shares, and a brief description of the procedure to be followed if the shareholder desires to exercise the shareholder’s right under those sections. The statement of price constitutes an offer by the corporation to purchase at the price stated any dissenting shares as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 1300, unless they lose their status as dissenting shares under Section 1309.

(b) Any shareholder who has a right to require the corporation to purchase the shareholder’s shares for cash under Section 1300, subject to compliance with paragraphs (3) and (4) of subdivision (b) thereof, and who desires the corporation to purchase shares shall make written demand upon the corporation for the purchase of those shares and payment to
 the shareholder in cash of their fair market value. The demand is not effective for any purpose unless it is received by the corporation or any transfer agent thereof (1) in the case of shares described in subdivision (b) of Section 1300, not later than the date of the shareholders’ meeting to vote upon the reorganization, or (2) in any other case, within 30 days after the date on which the notice of the approval by the outstanding shares pursuant to subdivision (a) or the notice pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1110 was mailed to the shareholder.

(c) The demand shall state the number and class of the shares held of record by the shareholder which the shareholder demands that the corporation purchase and shall contain a statement of what the shareholder claims to be the fair market value of those shares as determined pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1300. The statement of fair market value constitutes an offer by the shareholder to
 sell the shares at that price.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 473, Sec. 2.   (AB 1680)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1302.

Within 30 days after the date on which notice of the approval by the outstanding shares or the notice pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1110 was mailed to the shareholder, the shareholder shall submit to the corporation at its principal office or at the office of any transfer agent thereof, (a) if the shares are certificated securities, the shareholder’s certificates representing any shares which the shareholder demands
 that the corporation purchase, to be stamped or endorsed with a statement that the shares are dissenting shares or to be exchanged for certificates of appropriate denomination so stamped or endorsed or (b) if the shares are uncertificated securities, written notice of the number of shares which the shareholder demands that the corporation purchase. Upon subsequent transfers of the dissenting shares on the books of the corporation, the new certificates, initial transaction statement, and other written statements issued therefor shall bear a like statement, together with the name of the original dissenting holder of the shares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 473, Sec. 3.   (AB 1680)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1303.

(a) If the corporation and the shareholder agree that the shares are dissenting shares and agree upon the price of the shares, the dissenting shareholder is entitled to the agreed price with interest thereon at the legal rate on judgments from the date of the agreement. Any agreements fixing the fair market value of any dissenting shares as between the corporation and the holders thereof shall be filed with the secretary of the corporation.

(b) Subject to the provisions of Section 1306, payment of the fair market value of dissenting shares shall be made within 30 days
 after the amount thereof has been agreed or within 30 days after any statutory or contractual conditions to the reorganization are satisfied, whichever is later, and in the case of certificated securities, subject to surrender of the certificates therefor, unless provided otherwise by agreement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 766, Sec. 24.)
-------------------------------------------

1304.

(a) If the corporation denies that the shares are dissenting shares, or the corporation and the shareholder fail to agree upon the fair market value of the shares, then the shareholder demanding purchase of such shares as dissenting shares or any interested corporation, within six months after the date on which notice of the approval by the outstanding shares (Section 152) or notice pursuant to subdivision
 (h) of Section 1110 was mailed to the shareholder, but not thereafter, may file a complaint in the superior court of the proper county praying the court to determine whether the shares are dissenting shares or the fair market value of the dissenting shares or both or may intervene in any action pending on such a complaint.

(b) Two or more dissenting shareholders may join as plaintiffs or be joined as defendants in any such action and two or more such actions may be consolidated.

(c) On the trial of the action, the court shall determine the issues. If the status of the shares as dissenting shares is in issue, the court shall first determine that issue. If the fair market value of the dissenting shares is in issue, the court shall determine, or shall appoint one or more impartial appraisers to determine, the fair market value of the shares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 473, Sec. 4.   (AB 1680)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1305.

(a) If the court appoints an appraiser or appraisers, they shall proceed forthwith to determine the fair market value per share. Within the time fixed by the court, the appraisers, or a majority of them, shall make and file a report in the office of the clerk of the court. Thereupon, on the motion of any party, the report shall be submitted to the court and considered on such evidence as the court considers relevant. If the court finds the report reasonable, the court may confirm it.

(b) If a majority of the appraisers appointed fail to make and file a report within 10
 days from the date of their appointment or within such further time as may be allowed by the court or the report is not confirmed by the court, the court shall determine the fair market value of the dissenting shares.

(c) Subject to the provisions of Section 1306, judgment shall be rendered against the corporation for payment of an amount equal to the fair market value of each dissenting share multiplied by the number of dissenting shares which any dissenting shareholder who is a party, or who has intervened, is entitled to require the corporation to purchase, with interest thereon at the legal rate from the date on which judgment was entered.

(d) Any such judgment shall be payable forthwith with respect to uncertificated securities and, with respect to certificated securities, only upon the endorsement and delivery to the corporation of the certificates for the shares described
 in the judgment. Any party may appeal from the judgment.

(e) The costs of the action, including reasonable compensation to the appraisers to be fixed by the court, shall be assessed or apportioned as the court considers equitable, but, if the appraisal exceeds the price offered by the corporation, the corporation shall pay the costs (including in the discretion of the court attorneys’ fees, fees of expert witnesses and interest at the legal rate on judgments from the date of compliance with Sections 1300, 1301 and 1302 if the value awarded by the court for the shares is more than 125 percent of the price offered by the corporation under subdivision (a) of Section 1301).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 766, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

1306.

To the extent that the provisions of Chapter 5 prevent the payment to any holders of dissenting shares of their fair market value, they shall become creditors of the corporation for the amount thereof together with interest at the legal rate on judgments until the date of payment, but subordinate to all other creditors in any liquidation proceeding, such debt to be payable when permissible under the provisions of Chapter 5.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1307.

Cash dividends declared and paid by the corporation upon the dissenting shares after the date of approval of the reorganization by the outstanding shares (Section 152) and prior to payment for the shares by the corporation shall be credited against the total amount to be paid by the corporation therefor.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1308.

Except as expressly limited in this chapter, holders of dissenting shares continue to have all the rights and privileges incident to their shares, until the fair market value of their shares is agreed upon or determined. A dissenting shareholder may not withdraw a demand for payment unless the corporation consents thereto.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1309.

Dissenting shares lose their status as dissenting shares and the holders thereof cease to be dissenting shareholders and cease to be entitled to require the corporation to purchase their shares upon the happening of any of the following:

(a) The corporation abandons the reorganization. Upon abandonment of the reorganization, the corporation shall pay on demand to
 any dissenting shareholder who has initiated proceedings in good faith under this chapter all necessary expenses incurred in such proceedings and reasonable attorneys’ fees.

(b) The shares are transferred prior to their submission for endorsement in accordance with Section 1302 or are surrendered for conversion into shares of another class in accordance with the articles.

(c) The dissenting shareholder and the corporation do not agree upon the status of the shares as dissenting shares or upon the purchase price of the shares, and neither files a complaint or intervenes in a pending action as provided in Section 1304, within six months after the date on which notice of the approval by the outstanding shares or notice pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1110 was mailed to the shareholder.

(d) The dissenting
 shareholder, with the consent of the corporation, withdraws the shareholder’s demand for purchase of the dissenting shares.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 473, Sec. 5.   (AB 1680)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

1310.

If litigation is instituted to test the sufficiency or regularity of the votes of the shareholders in authorizing a reorganization, any proceedings under Sections 1304 and 1305 shall be suspended until final determination of such litigation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 682.)
-------------------------------------------

1311.

This chapter, except Section 1312, does not apply to classes of shares whose terms and provisions specifically set forth the amount to be paid in respect to such shares in the event of a reorganization or merger.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 919, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

1312.

(a) No shareholder of a corporation who has a right under this chapter to demand payment of cash for the shares held by the shareholder shall have any right at law or in equity to attack the validity of the reorganization or short-form merger, or to have the reorganization or short-form merger set aside or rescinded, except in an action to test whether the number of shares required to authorize or approve the reorganization have been legally voted in favor thereof; but any holder of shares of a class whose terms and provisions specifically set forth the amount to be paid in respect to them in the event of a reorganization or
 short-form merger is entitled to payment in accordance with those terms and provisions or, if the principal terms of the reorganization are approved pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1202, is entitled to payment in accordance with the terms and provisions of the approved reorganization.

(b) If one of the parties to a reorganization or short-form merger is directly or indirectly controlled by, or under common control with, another party to the reorganization or short-form merger, subdivision (a) shall not apply to any shareholder of such party who has not demanded payment of cash for such shareholder’s shares pursuant to this chapter; but if the shareholder institutes any action to attack the validity of the reorganization or short-form merger or to have the reorganization or short-form merger set aside or rescinded, the shareholder shall not thereafter have any right to demand payment of cash for the shareholder’s shares pursuant to this
 chapter. The court in any action attacking the validity of the reorganization or short-form merger or to have the reorganization or short-form merger set aside or rescinded shall not restrain or enjoin the consummation of the transaction except upon 10 days’ prior notice to the corporation and upon a determination by the court that clearly no other remedy will adequately protect the complaining shareholder or the class of shareholders of which such shareholder is a member.

(c) If one of the parties to a reorganization or short-form merger is directly or indirectly controlled by, or under common control with, another party to the reorganization or short-form merger, in any action to attack the validity of the reorganization or short-form merger or to have the reorganization or short-form merger set aside or rescinded, (1) a party to a reorganization or short-form merger which controls another party to the reorganization or short-form merger
 shall have the burden of proving that the transaction is just and reasonable as to the shareholders of the controlled party, and (2) a person who controls two or more parties to a reorganization shall have the burden of proving that the transaction is just and reasonable as to the shareholders of any party so controlled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 919, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

1313.

A conversion pursuant to Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 1150) shall be deemed to constitute a reorganization for purposes of applying the provisions of this chapter, in accordance with and to the extent provided in Section 1159.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 480, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Bankruptcy Reorganizations and Arrangements [1400. - 1403.]

1400.

(a) Any domestic corporation with respect to which a proceeding has been initiated under any applicable statute of the United States, as now existing or hereafter enacted, relating to reorganizations of corporations, has full power and authority to put into effect and carry out any plan of reorganization and the orders of the court or judge entered in such proceeding and may take any proceeding and do any act provided in the plan or directed by such orders, without further action by its board or shareholders. Such power and authority may be exercised and such proceedings and acts may be taken, as may be directed by such orders, by the trustee or trustees of such corporation appointed in the reorganization proceeding (or a majority thereof),
 or if none is appointed and acting, by officers of the corporation designated or a master or other representative appointed by the court or judge, with like effect as if exercised and taken by unanimous action of the board and shareholders of the corporation.

(b) Such corporation may, in the manner provided in subdivision (a), but without limiting the generality or effect of subdivision (a), alter, amend or repeal its bylaws; constitute or reconstitute its board and name, constitute or appoint directors and officers in place of or in addition to all or some of the directors or officers then in office; amend its articles; make any change in its capital stock; make any other amendment, change, alteration or provision authorized by this division; be dissolved, transfer all or part of its assets or merge as permitted by this division, in which case, however,
 no shareholder shall have any statutory dissenter’s rights; change the location of its principal office or remove or appoint an agent to receive service of process; authorize and fix the terms, manner and conditions of the issuance of bonds, debentures or other obligations, whether or not convertible into shares of any class or bearing warrants or rights to purchase or subscribe to shares of any class; or lease its property and franchises to any corporation, if permitted by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 23.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.

(a) A certificate of any amendment, change or alteration or of dissolution or any agreement of merger made by a corporation pursuant to Section 1400 and executed as provided in subdivision (b), shall be filed and shall thereupon become effective in accordance with its terms and the provisions of this chapter.

(b) The certificate, agreement of merger, or other instrument shall be signed and verified, as may be directed by the orders of the court or judge, by the trustee or trustees appointed in the reorganization proceeding (or a majority thereof) or, if none is appointed and acting, by officers of the corporation designated or by a master or other representative appointed by the court or judge, and shall state that provision for the making of that certificate,
 agreement of merger, or instrument is contained in an order, identifying the same, of a court or judge having jurisdiction of a proceeding under a statute of the United States for the reorganization of that corporation.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), a trustee, liquidating agent, responsible officer, or other representative appointed by the court for a corporation, with respect to which a proceeding has been initiated under any applicable statute of the United States as described in subdivision (a) of Section 1401.5 may execute and file a certificate of dissolution as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 1401.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 267, Sec. 1.   (SB 340)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

1401.5.

(a) A trustee, liquidating agent, responsible officer, or other representative appointed by the court for a corporation subject to an order for relief entered in a case under Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1101) of Title 11 of the United States Code may sign and verify a certificate of dissolution when the corporation has been completely wound up.

(b) The certificate of dissolution shall state the following:

(1) The name of the corporation.

(2) That an order for relief was entered in a case under Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 1101) of Title 11 of the United States Code with respect to the corporation.

(3) The identification of the court in which the order for relief was entered and the court’s file number for the matter.

(4) That an order confirming a reorganization plan has been entered in that case.

(5) That the undersigned has been appointed by the court as a trustee, liquidating agent, responsible officer, or other representative of the corporation.

(6) That the shares of the corporation have been canceled pursuant to the terms of that plan.

(7) That the assets of the corporation have been distributed pursuant to the terms of that plan.

(8) That the corporation is dissolved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 47.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

1402.

The provisions of this chapter shall cease to apply to a corporation upon the entry of a final decree in the reorganization proceeding closing the case and discharging the trustee or trustees, if any, whether or not jurisdiction may be retained thereafter by the court for limited purposes which do not relate to the consummation of the plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 17.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1403.

For filing any certificate, agreement or other paper pursuant to this chapter there shall be paid to the Secretary of State the same fees as are payable by corporations not in reorganization proceedings upon the filing of like certificates, agreements or other papers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 500, Sec. 18.   (AB 1059)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Records and Reports [1500. - 1512.]

1500.

Each corporation shall keep adequate and correct books and records of account and shall keep minutes of the proceedings of its shareholders, board and committees of the board and shall keep at its principal office, or at the office of its transfer agent or registrar, a record of its shareholders, giving the names and addresses of all shareholders and the number and class of shares held by each. Those minutes and other books and records shall be kept either in written form or in another form capable of being converted into clearly legible tangible form or in any combination of the foregoing. When minutes and other books and records are kept in a form capable of being converted into clearly legible paper form, the clearly legible
 paper form into which those minutes and other books and records are converted shall be admissible in evidence, and accepted for all other purposes, to the same extent as an original paper record of the same information would have been, provided that the paper form accurately portrays the record.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 24.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1501.

(a) (1) The board shall cause an annual report to be sent to the shareholders not later than 120 days after the close of the fiscal year, unless in the case of a corporation with less than 100 holders of record of its shares (determined as provided in Section 605) this requirement is expressly waived in the bylaws. Unless otherwise provided by the articles or bylaws and if approved by the board of directors, that report and any accompanying material sent pursuant to this section may be sent by electronic transmission by the corporation (Section 20). This report shall contain a balance sheet as of the end of that fiscal year and an income statement and a statement of cashflows for that fiscal year,
 accompanied by any report thereon of independent accountants or, if there is no report, the certificate of an authorized officer of the corporation that the statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the corporation.

(2) Unless so waived, the report specified in paragraph (1) shall be sent to the shareholders at least 15 (or, if sent by third-class mail, 35) days before the annual meeting of shareholders to be held during the next fiscal year, but this requirement shall not limit the requirement for holding an annual meeting as required by Section 600.

(3) Notwithstanding Section 114, the financial statements of any corporation with fewer than 100 holders of record of its shares (determined as provided in Section 605) required to be furnished by
 this subdivision and subdivision (c) are not required to be prepared in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles if they reasonably set forth the assets and liabilities and the income and expense of the corporation and disclose the accounting basis used in their preparation.

(4) The requirements described in paragraphs (1) and (2) shall be satisfied if a corporation with an outstanding class of securities registered under Section 12 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 complies with Section 240.14a-16 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as it may be amended from time to time, with respect to the obligation of a corporation to furnish an annual report to shareholders pursuant to Section 240.14a-3(b) of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(b) In addition to the financial statements required by subdivision (a), the annual report of any corporation having 100 or more holders of record of its shares (determined as provided in Section 605) either not subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, or exempted from those reporting requirements by Section 12(g)(2) of that act, shall also describe briefly both of the following:

(1) Any transaction (excluding compensation of officers and directors) during the previous fiscal year involving an amount in excess of forty thousand dollars ($40,000) (other than contracts let at competitive bid or services rendered at prices regulated by law) to which the corporation or its parent or subsidiary was a party and in which any director or officer of the corporation or of a subsidiary or (if
 known to the corporation or its parent or subsidiary) any holder of more than 10 percent of the outstanding voting shares of the corporation had a direct or indirect material interest, naming the person and stating the person’s relationship to the corporation, the nature of the person’s interest in the transaction and, where practicable, the amount of the interest; provided that in the case of a transaction with a partnership of which the person is a partner, only the interest of the partnership need be stated; and provided further that no report need be made in the case of any transaction approved by the shareholders (Section 153).

(2) The amount and circumstances of any indemnification or advances aggregating more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) paid during the fiscal year to any officer or director of the corporation pursuant
 to Section 317; provided that no report need be made in the case of indemnification approved by the shareholders (Section 153) under paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 317.

(c) If no annual report for the last fiscal year has been sent to shareholders, the corporation shall, upon the written request of any shareholder made more than 120 days after the close of that fiscal year, deliver or mail to the person making the request within 30 days thereafter the financial statements required by subdivision (a) for that year. A shareholder or shareholders holding at least 5 percent of the outstanding shares of any class of a corporation may make a written request to the corporation for an income statement of the corporation for the three-month, six-month, or nine-month period of the current fiscal year ended more than 30 days before
 the date of the request and a balance sheet of the corporation as of the end of the period and, in addition, if no annual report for the last fiscal year has been sent to shareholders, the statements referred to in subdivision (a) for the last fiscal year. The statements shall be delivered or mailed to the person making the request within 30 days thereafter. A copy of the statements shall be kept on file in the principal office of the corporation for 12 months and it shall be exhibited at all reasonable times to any shareholder demanding an examination of the statements or a copy shall be mailed to the shareholder.

(d) The quarterly income statements and balance sheets referred to in this section shall be accompanied by the report thereon, if any, of any independent accountants engaged by the corporation or the certificate of an
 authorized officer of the corporation that the financial statements were prepared without audit from the books and records of the corporation.

(e) In addition to the penalties provided for in Section 2200, the superior court of the proper county shall enforce the duty of making and mailing or delivering the information and financial statements required by this section and, for good cause shown, may extend the time therefor.

(f) In any action or proceeding under this section, if the court finds the failure of the corporation to comply with the requirements of this section to have been without justification, the court may award an amount sufficient to reimburse the shareholder for the reasonable expenses incurred by the shareholder, including attorney’s fees, in connection with
 the action or proceeding.

(g) This section applies to any domestic corporation and also to a foreign corporation having its principal office in California or customarily holding meetings of its board in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 617, Sec. 25.   (SB 1202)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

1502.

(a) Every corporation shall file, within 90 days after the filing of its original articles and annually thereafter during the applicable filing period, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, a statement containing all of the following:

(1) The name of the corporation and the Secretary of State’s file number.

(2) The names and complete business or residence addresses of its incumbent directors.

(3) The number of vacancies on the board, if any.

(4) The names and complete business or residence addresses of its chief executive officer, secretary,
 and chief financial officer.

(5) The street address of its principal executive office.

(6) The mailing address of the corporation, if different from the street address of its principal executive office.

(7) If the address of its principal executive office is not in this state, the street address of its principal business office in this state, if any.

(8) If the corporation chooses to receive renewal notices and any other notifications from the Secretary of State by electronic mail instead of by United States mail, the corporation shall include a valid electronic mail address for the corporation or for the corporation’s designee to receive those notices.

(9) A statement of the general type
 of business that constitutes the principal business activity of the corporation, such as, for example, manufacturer of aircraft, wholesale liquor distributor, or retail department store.

(10) A statement indicating whether any officer or any director has an outstanding final judgment issued by the Division of Labor Standards Enforcement or a court of law, for which no appeal therefrom is pending, for the violation of any wage order or provision of the Labor Code.

(b) The statement required by subdivision (a) shall also designate, as the agent of the corporation for the purpose of service of process, a natural person residing in this state or a corporation that has complied with Section 1505 and whose capacity to act as an agent has not terminated. If a natural person is designated, the statement shall set forth that person’s complete business or residence street address. If a
 corporate agent is designated, no address for it shall be set forth.

(c) If there has been no change in the information in the last filed statement of the corporation on file in the Secretary of State’s office, the corporation may, in lieu of filing the statement required by subdivisions (a) and (b), advise the Secretary of State, on a form prescribed by the Secretary of State, that no changes in the required information have occurred during the applicable filing period.

(d) For the purposes of this section, the applicable filing period for a corporation shall be the calendar month during which its original articles were filed and the immediately preceding five calendar months. The Secretary of State shall provide a notice to each corporation to comply with this section approximately three months prior to the close of the applicable filing period. The notice shall state the due